Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1086.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 16302(a) of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 16302. Restrictions as to certain property.(a) Prohibition.--Except as provided in subsection (b), land or property used for a cemetery, burying ground or place of public worship, including land not used for a cemetery, burying ground or place of public worship but owned by a cemetery or religious institution, may not be taken or appropriated by virtue of a power contained in this chapter.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617